Massachusetts, session 194th, H1859.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 119 be amended to add the following new section 
51I: 
51I: (a) A parent or legal guardian shall not be charged with abusing or neglecting a 
child’s need for medical care if: 
(i) the parent or legal guardian has sought medical care for the child from a licensed 
medical or mental health provider; 
(ii) the licensed medical or mental health provider has made a diagnosis; 
(iii) the licensed medical or mental health provider has prescribed a lawful course of 
treatment; and 

of 2 10  (iv) the parent or legal guardian is following or willing to follow the recommended 
course of treatment. 
(b) No mandatory reporter, as defined in Section 21 of this Chapter, shall file a report of 
abuse or neglect under Section 51 of this Chapter based solely on a parent’s or legal guardian’s 
decision to follow the recommended treatment of a licensed medical or mental health provider. A 
parent or legal guardian has the right to follow the advice and treatment plan of a licensed 
medical or mental health provider over a contrary opinion or recommended treatment plan of 
another licensed medical or mental health provider when the decision does not involve 
immediate life-threatening conditions. Even in the case of life-threatening conditions, the 
decision of the parent or legal guardian to follow the advice or treatment plan of a licensed 
medical or mental health provider shall not be overridden unless there is clear and convincing 
evidence to the contrary.